Hawaii statutes.
§412:8-203 Use of nominees. A
trust company acting in a fiduciary or agency capacity, and any fiduciary
acting as a co-fiduciary with a trust company, may cause any stock, bond, or
other security held in such capacity to be registered or held in the name of a
nominee or nominees of the trust company or in the name of the trust company,
without disclosing such fiduciary or agency capacity unless expressly otherwise
provided by the instrument creating the fiduciary or agency relationship;
provided, that the trust company:

(1) Shall permit the nominee to have possession of or
access to the stock, bond, or other security;

(2) Shall clearly show on its records the name of the
nominee and that the security is held by such person; and

(3) Shall be responsible for any loss resulting from
the act of the nominee. No liability for any loss occasioned by the acts of
the trust company or its nominee or nominees, with respect to any stock, bond,
or other security so registered or held, shall be imposed upon any corporation
the stock, bond, or other security of which is registered in the name of the
trust company or the nominee or nominees, or upon the transfer agent or
registrar of the corporation. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next